Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF645.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. NEW SECTION . 657.13 Racing facilities and racetracks ââ immunity. 1. A racing facility or racetrack shall not be subject to any action brought by a surrounding property owner under any nuisance, taking, or other theory if the racing facility or racetrack was built before the surrounding real property owner either purchased the real property or built in the area of the racing facility or racetrack. 2. This section applies to claims against racing facilities and racetracks located in this state prior to the date the surrounding real property owner bringing the claim acquired or improved the real property. 3. For the purposes of this section a âracing facilityâ or âracetrackâ means a designated area or facility where competitive vehicle and motorsport races are conducted. A House File 645, p. 2 âracing facilityâ or âracetrackâ includes the track, spectator areas, garages, and any associated grounds or buildings used to operate the races. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 645, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor